Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 353.656, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Limitation on disability benefit payments. (a) No member is entitled to receive a disability benefit payment when there remains to the member's credit unused annual leave, sick leave, or any other employer-provided salary continuation plan, or under any other circumstances when, during the period of disability, there has been no impairment of the person's salary as a police officer, a firefighter, or a paramedic as defined in section 353.64, subdivision 10, whichever applies. (b) This paragraph applies to members who begin disability payments before July 1, 2023deleted text begin , and either are not required to reapply under section 353.031, subdivision 8, or have not reached the end of one year or three years, as applicable, when reapplication under section 353.031, subdivision 8, is requireddeleted text end . If a disabled member resumes a gainful occupation with earnings that, when added to the single life disability benefit, and workers' compensation benefit if applicable, exceed the disability benefit recipient's reemployment earnings limit, the amount of the disability benefit must be reduced during the months of employment and receipt of workers' compensation benefits, if applicable, as provided in this paragraph. The disability benefit recipient's reemployment earnings limit is the greater of (1) the monthly salary earned at the date of disability, or (2) 125 percent of the base monthly salary currently paid by the employing governmental subdivision for similar positions. The disability benefit must be reduced by one dollar for each three dollars by which the total amount of the current monthly disability benefit, any monthly workers' compensation benefits if applicable, and actual monthly earnings exceed the greater disability benefit recipient's reemployment earnings limit. In no event may the monthly disability benefit as adjusted under this subdivision exceed the disability benefit originally allowed. (c) This paragraph applies to members who begin disability payments deleted text begin or are required to reapply under section 353.031, subdivision 8,deleted text end on or after July 1, 2023. Beginning the calendar year after application deleted text begin or reapplicationdeleted text end , if a disabled member resumes a gainful occupation with earnings, the amount of the member's disability benefit must be reduced each year until normal retirement age by the sum of clauses (1) and (2), not to exceed the amount of the member's disability benefit: (1) for members with less than 20 years of service for a duty disability benefit or less than 15 years of service for a regular disability benefit, one dollar for each dollar of reemployment earnings, but not more than the lesser of (i) and (ii), and not to exceed the employee contribution rate as defined under section 353.65, subdivision 2, multiplied by the average salary used to determine the amount of the member's disability benefit when granted: (i) an amount equal to the employee contribution rate as defined under section 353.65, subdivision 2, multiplied by the average salary used to determine the amount of the member's disability benefit, when granted, multiplied by the difference between 20 for a duty disability benefit or 15 for a regular disability benefit and the member's years of service, divided by 55 minus the member's age at the time of disability; or (ii) 50 percent of the member's yearly reemployment earnings; and (2) for all members: (i) one dollar for every two dollars, up to 125 percent of the base monthly salary, by which the sum exceeds the base monthly salary; and (ii) one dollar for each dollar by which the sum exceeds 125 percent of the base monthly salary; where "sum" means the sum of the current disability benefit plus actual monthly reemployment earnings and "base monthly salary" means the base monthly salary currently paid by the employing governmental subdivision for similar positions. (d) Paragraphs (b) and (c) do not apply to a member receiving total and permanent disability benefits under section 353.656, subdivision 1a or 3a. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end